Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 8. Expiration of Licenses.

Sec. 04.11.540.
License renewal and expiration.

Notwithstanding AS

04.11.680

, an application for renewal of a license issued for the two calendar years ending December 31 or of a seasonal license issued for parts of those calendar years may be submitted up until the next February 28. If a complete application for renewal has not been filed by February 28 or the required fees and the penalty fees have not been paid by that date, the license expires at 12:00 midnight February 28. A new license may not be issued to the holder of an expired license for the same premises except on proof satisfactory to the board of good cause for the failure to file and pay.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 29 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Collateral references. —

48 C.J.S., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 201-204.

Sec. 04.11.540.
License, endorsement, and conditional contractor’s permit renewal and expiration.

Notwithstanding AS

04.11.680

, an application for renewal of a license, an endorsement, or a conditional contractor’s permit under AS

04.09.690

issued for the two calendar years ending December 31 or of a seasonal license issued for parts of those calendar years may be submitted up until the next February 28. If a complete application for renewal has not been filed by February 28 or the required fees and the penalty fees have not been paid by that date, the license, endorsement, or conditional contractor’s permit expires at 12:00 midnight February 28. A new license may not be issued to the holder of an expired license for the same premises except on proof satisfactory to the board of good cause for the failure to file and pay.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 29 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 77 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.550.
Notice of expiration.

On or before February 15, the director shall mail a notice of expiration to each licensee who has not either (1) filed an application to renew a license, along with any applicable affidavits and all fees due, or (2) notified the director of an intent not to do so.
Failure of the director to mail this notice of expiration does not waive the requirement that the application for renewal be filed by February 28.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)